Missouri, session 2026, HB3016.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 441.060, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 441.060, 441.238, and 534.125, to read as follows:
441.060. 1. A tenancy at will or by sufferance, or for less than one year, may be
terminated by the person entitled to the possession by giving one month's notice, in writing, to
the person in possession, requiring the person in possession to vacate the premises.
2. An occupancy limitation of two persons per bedroom residing in a dwelling unit
shall be presumed reasonable for this state. The two-person limitation shall not apply to a
child or children born to the tenants during the course of the lease.
3. Except as otherwise provided by law, all contracts or agreements for the leasing,
renting or occupation of stores, shops, houses, tenements or other buildings in cities, towns or
villages, and of stores, shops, houses, tenements or other buildings except when such leasing,
renting or occupation is as tenant of real estate used or rented for agricultural purposes, other
than garden purposes, not made in writing, signed by the parties thereto, or their agents, shall
be held and taken to be tenancies from month to month, and all such tenancies may be
terminated by either party thereto, or the party's agent, giving to the other party, or the party's
agent, one month's notice, in writing, of the party's intention to terminate such tenancy.
4. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), the landlord or the tenant may terminate
a month-to-month tenancy by a written notice given to the other party stating that the tenancy
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3016 2
shall terminate upon a periodic rent-paying date not less than one month after the receipt of
the notice.
(2) When a person occupies and has an ownership interest in a mobile home and is
leasing the land or the lot upon which the mobile home is located, a tenancy for less than one
year may be terminated by the landlord only for cause by giving written notice to the tenant
that the tenancy shall terminate not sooner than sixty days from the date the rent payment next
becomes due unless the tenant cures any violation specified in the notice of the conditions
of the lease, of applicable rules and regulations, or of section 441.020 or 441.030 within
fifteen days of receipt of the notice, notwithstanding any written lease provision regarding
earlier lease termination to the contrary.
5. If a person occupies and has an ownership interest in a mobile home and is
leasing the land or the lot upon which the mobile home is located under a lease for more
than one month with a specified termination date, the landlord may refuse to renew the
lease only for cause by giving written notice not less than sixty days before the
termination date that the lease will not be renewed unless the tenant cures violations
specified in the notice of the conditions of the lease, applicable rules and regulations, or
section 441.020 or 441.030 within fifteen days of receipt of the notice.
6. If after the rendition of a judgment and a request for an execution on any judgment
rendered in an action pursuant to chapter 524, chapter 534, chapter 535, or this chapter and
there is no stay of execution, the service officer fails to deliver possession of the premises to
the landlord within seven days of the delivery of the writ to such officer, the landlord may,
within sixty days of the date of the judgment, in the presence of a municipal or county law
enforcement officer of the jurisdiction in which the premises are located, without breach of
the peace, break and remove locks, enter and take possession of the premises and remove any
household goods, furnishings, fixtures or any other personal property left in or at the
premises, provided the law enforcement officer is first presented a true copy of the judgment
and order of execution, and the law enforcement officer acknowledges in writing such
presentation, and such acknowledgment is filed in court by the plaintiff within five days
following taking possession of the premises.
[6.] 7. Except for negligent, willful or wanton acts or omissions of the landlord, or
failure to both timely obtain and file the law enforcement officer acknowledgment described
in the preceding subsection, the landlord shall have no liability for loss or damage to any
household goods, furnishings, fixtures or any other personal property left in or at the dwelling
unit, by reason of the landlord's removal of the property in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
441.238. 1. A landlord shall not engage in conduct described in subsection 2 of
this section if the landlord's purpose is to retaliate against a tenant who:

HB 3016 3
(1) Complained to a governmental agency responsible for enforcement of a
building, housing, fire, or health code or other law, alleging a violation applicable to the
premises materially affecting the health or safety of the tenant or the tenant's immediate
family member;
(2) Complained to a governmental agency responsible for enforcement of laws
prohibiting discrimination in rental housing;
(3) Complained to the landlord of noncompliance with the lease or
noncompliance with the landlord's duty to maintain the premises in habitable condition;
(4) Organized or became a member of a tenant's union or similar organization;
(5) Exercised or attempted to exercise a right or remedy under the lease or
landlord-tenant statutes or law other than the statutes; or
(6) Pursued an action or administrative remedy against the landlord or testified
against the landlord in court or an administrative proceeding.
2. Conduct that may be retaliatory under subsection 1 of this section includes
doing or threatening to do any of the following:
(1) Increasing the rent or fees;
(2) Decreasing services, increasing the tenant's obligations, imposing different
rules on, or selectively enforcing the landlord's rules against the tenant or the tenant's
immediate family member, or otherwise materially altering the terms of the lease;
(3) Bringing an action for possession on a ground other than nonpayment of
rent;
(4) Refusing to renew a tenancy for a fixed term under a lease containing a
renewal option that is exercisable by the tenant without negotiation with the landlord
for any period after the lease would otherwise terminate;
(5) Terminating a periodic tenancy; or
(6) Committing a criminal act against the tenant, the tenant's immediate family
member, or the tenant's guest.
3. A landlord shall not be liable for retaliation under subsection 1 of this section
if:
(1) The violation of which the tenant complained under subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection 1 of this section was caused primarily by the tenant, the tenant's immediate
family member, or the tenant's guest;
(2) The tenant's conduct described in subsection 1 of this section was in an
unreasonable manner or at an unreasonable time or was repeated in a manner
harassing the landlord;
(3) The tenant was in default in the payment of rent at the time notice of the
action described in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section was sent;

HB 3016 4
(4) The tenant, the tenant's immediate family member, or the tenant's guest
engaged in conduct that threatened the health or safety of another tenant on the
premises;
(5) The tenant, the tenant's immediate family member, or the tenant's guest
engaged in a criminal act;
(6) The landlord is seeking to recover possession based on a notice to terminate
the lease and the notice was given to the tenant before the tenant engaged in conduct
described in subsection 1 of this section; or
(7) The landlord is complying or complied with a building, housing, fire, or
health code or other law by making a required repair, alteration, remodeling, or
demolition that effectively deprives the tenant of the use and enjoyment of the premises.
4. If a landlord's purpose for engaging in conduct described in subsection 2 of
this section is to retaliate against the tenant for conduct described in subsection 1 of this
section:
(1) The tenant has a defense against an action for possession, may recover
possession, or may terminate the lease; and
(2) The tenant may recover two times the periodic rent or two times the actual
damages, whichever is greater.
5. If a tenant terminates a lease under subsection 4 of this section, the landlord
shall return any security deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant is entitled.
6. A tenant's exercise of rights under subsections 4 and 5 of this section does not
release the landlord from liability to the tenant for the landlord's failure to maintain the
premises in habitable condition or the landlord's noncompliance with the lease that
results in the tenant not receiving an essential service, that materially interferes with the
health or safety of the tenant or the tenant's immediate family member, or that
materially interferes with the use and enjoyment of the premises by the tenant or the
tenant's immediate family member.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 of this section, evidence that a
tenant engaged in conduct described in subsection 1 of this section within six months
before the landlord's alleged retaliatory conduct creates a rebuttable presumption that
the purpose of the landlord's conduct was retaliation.
8. A presumption does not arise under subsection 7 of this section if the tenant
engaged in conduct described in subsection 1 of this section after the landlord gave the
tenant notice of the landlord's intent to engage in conduct described in subdivisions (1)
to (5) of subsection 2 of this section.
9. A landlord may rebut a presumption under subsection 7 of this section by a
preponderance of evidence showing that the landlord had sufficient justification for

HB 3016 5
engaging in the conduct that created the presumption and would have engaged in the
conduct in the same manner and at the same time whether or not the tenant engaged in
conduct described in subsection 1 of this section.
10. If a tenant engages in conduct described in subdivision (1) or (5) of
subsection 1 of this section knowing there is no factual or legal basis for the conduct, the
landlord may recover actual damages and the court may award the landlord up to two
times the periodic rent.
534.125. The defendant may file an answer, legal and equitable defenses,
counterclaims, and cross claims not later than the return date and time of the summons
unless leave to file the same at a later date is granted by the court. If the defendant files
no pleading, the statements made in the petition shall be considered denied.
✔